Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB838.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "private licensed school" in section 2 of the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Private licensed school." A school or classes operated for profit or tuition that provides resident instruction to prepare an individual to pursue an occupation in the skilled trades, industry or business, or systematic instruction by distance education in a field of study. It shall not include a private 1234567891011121314151617181920 academic school as defined in section 2 of the act of January 28, 1988 (P.L.24, No.11), known as the Private Academic Schools Act; a school maintained or a class conducted for training for the vocation of homemaking or to give training in public and other service occupations; a barber school; a school of cosmetology; a school or provider approved by the State Real Estate Commission or the State Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers; a flight school; a private tutorial school, including, but not limited to, a school of music or dance; an institution granting a degree other than those approved to award the degree of associate in specialized business or associate in specialized technology; a school or class conducted by an employer or trade union for employees or union members where no fee or tuition is charged; a school owned and operated by a bona fide religious institution whose only purpose is the providing of religious instruction; a school conducted by the Commonwealth or a political subdivision thereof; or a school which is operated by a hospital licensed under the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, and which is accredited by a regional or national accreditation agency.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0838PN0904 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223